North Carolina, session 2025, HB608.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-458 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-458. Computer trespass; penalty.
(a) Except as otherwise made unlawful by this Article, it shall be unlawful for any person
to use a computer or computer network without authority and with the intent to do any of the
following:
(1) Temporarily or permanently remove, halt, or otherwise disable any computer
data, computer programs, or computer software from a computer or computer
network.
(2) Cause a computer to malfunction, regardless of how long the malfunction
persists.
(3) Alter or erase any computer data, computer programs, or computer software.
(4) Cause physical injury to the property of another.
(5) Make or cause to be made an unauthorized copy, in any form, including, but
not limited to, any printed or electronic form of computer data, computer
programs, or computer software residing in, communicated by, or produced
by a computer or computer network.
(6) Falsely identify with the intent to deceive or defraud the recipient or forge
commercial electronic mail transmission information or other routing
*H608-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
information in any manner in connection with the transmission of unsolicited
bulk commercial electronic mail through or into the computer network of an
electronic mail service provider or its subscribers.
For purposes of this subsection, a person is "without authority" when (i) the person has no
right or permission of the owner to use a computer, or the person uses a computer in a manner
exceeding the right or permission, or (ii) the person uses a computer or computer network, or the
computer services of an electronic mail service provider to transmit unsolicited bulk commercial
electronic mail in contravention of the authority granted by or in violation of the policies set by
the electronic mail service provider.provider, or (iii) in the case of computer data that is in a
personnel file of a local, State, or federal government employee, the person has no authority
under local, State, or federal law to view or otherwise access that information or has willfully
failed to follow the requirements of the local, State, or federal law granting such authority. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "personnel file" is as defined in G.S. 1-539.2A.
(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of computer trespass, which
offense shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor. If there is damage to the property of
another and the damage is valued at less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) caused
by the person's act in violation of this section, the offense shall be punished as a Class 1
misdemeanor. If there is damage to the property of another valued at two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) or more caused by the person's act in violation of this section, the offense shall
be punished as a Class I felony.
(c) Any person whose property or person is injured by reason of a violation of this section
may sue for and recover any damages sustained and the costs of the suit pursuant to
G.S. 1-539.2A.
(d) It is not a violation of this section for a person to act pursuant to Chapter 36F of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 2. G.S. 1-539.2A reads as rewritten:
"§ 1-539.2A. Damages for computer trespass.
(a) Any person whose property or person is injured by reason of a violation of
G.S. 14-458 may sue for and recover any damages sustained and the costs of the suit. Without
limiting the general of the term, "damages" shall include loss of profits. If the injury arises from
the transmission of unsolicited bulk commercial electronic mail, the injured person, other than
an electronic mail service provider, may also recover attorneys' fees and may elect, in lieu of
actual damages, to recover the lesser of ten dollars ($10.00) for each and every unsolicited bulk
commercial electronic mail message transmitted in violation of this section, or twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) per day. The injured person shall not have a cause of action against
the electronic mail service provider which merely transmits the unsolicited bulk commercial
electronic mail over its computer network. If the injury arises from the transmission of unsolicited
bulk commercial electronic mail, an injured electronic mail service provider may also recover
attorneys' fees and costs and may elect, in lieu of actual damages, to recover the greater of ten
dollars ($10.00) for each and every unsolicited bulk commercial electronic mail message
transmitted in violation of this section, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day.
(a1) If the injury arises from a violation of G.S. 14-458 involving trespass to computer
data that is protected health information, the injured person may sue and recover for each
violation the greater of the damages sustained or five thousand dollars ($5,000) and the costs of
the suit.
(a2) If the injury arises from a violation of G.S. 14-458 involving trespass to computer
data that is in the personnel file of a local, State, or federal employee, the injured person may sue
and recover for each violation the greater of the damages sustained or five thousand dollars
($5,000) and the costs of the suit.
(b) A civil action under this section shall be commenced before expiration of the time
period prescribed in G.S. 1-54. In actions alleging injury arising from the transmission of
Page 2 House Bill 608-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unsolicited bulk commercial electronic mail, personal jurisdiction may be exercised pursuant to
G.S. 1-75.4.
(c) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Damages. – Includes loss of profits.
(2) Personnel file. – Any employment-related or personal information gathered
by an employer about its employee. Employment-related information includes
information related to an individual's application, selection, promotion,
demotion, transfer, leave, salary, contract for employment, benefits,
suspension, performance evaluation, disciplinary actions, and termination.
Personal information includes an individual's home address, social security
number, medical history, personal financial data, marital status, dependents,
and beneficiaries.
(3) Protected health information. – As defined in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
House Bill 608-First Edition Page 3